Hawaii statutes.
§414-437 Registered agent of foreign
corporation. Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in
this State must continuously maintain in this State a registered agent, who may
be:

(1) An individual who resides in this State;

(2) A domestic entity authorized to transact business
in this State; or

(3) A foreign entity authorized to transact business
in this State. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 124, §13; am L 2009, c
55, §13]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next